Washington statutes.
RCW 26.52.080

Child custody disputes.

(1) Any disputes regarding provisions in foreign protection orders dealing with custody of children, residential placement of children, or visitation with children shall be resolved judicially. The proper venue and jurisdiction for such judicial proceedings shall be determined in accordance with chapter 26.27 RCW and in accordance with the parental kidnapping prevention act, 28 U.S.C. 1738A.

(2) A peace officer shall not remove a child from his or her current placement unless:

(a) A writ of habeas corpus to produce the child has been issued by a superior court of this state; or

(b) There is probable cause to believe that the child is abused or neglected and the child would be injured or could not be taken into custody if it were necessary to first obtain a court order pursuant to RCW 13.34.050.

[ 1999 c 184 s 10.]